Hawaii statutes.
§459-5 Records. The department of
commerce and consumer affairs on behalf of the board of examiners in optometry
shall preserve a record of all applications for examination. The record shall
also show whether applicants were rejected or licensed, and, if rejected, the
reasons therefor. [L 1917, c 187, §4; RL 1925, §1115; RL 1935, §1373; RL 1945,
§2804; RL 1955, §68-5; HRS §459-5; am L 1985, c 224, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next